Louisiana, session 2026, HB235.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1281.27 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1281.27. Authorization to install an individual sewerage system
A. A person may install and operate an individual sewerage system, subject
to the approval of the local governing authority where the property is located, and
is not required to connect to a community sewerage system unless the community
sewerage system is owned by a city, parish, or other municipality of this state.
B. For the purposes of this Section:
(1) "Community sewerage system" means any sewerage system which serves
multiple connections and may consist of systems to collect, transport, and treat
sewerage.
(2) "Individual sewerage system" means a collection of systems to collect,
transport, and treat sewerage located on the property where the sewerage originates.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-672 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 235